Hawaii statutes.
§47-4 Bonds for revenue-producing
undertakings. General obligation bonds may be issued under this chapter
for an undertaking or loan program as defined in section 49-1 or for any other
undertaking or purpose for which the bonds are authorized to be issued by other
provisions of general law. The bonds may be combined into, issued, and sold
with other general obligation bonds of the county as a single issue of bonds.
The governing body may require that the general fund of the county shall be
reimbursed from the revenue of the undertaking, loan program, or other purpose
for all of the principal of and interest on the bonds, or for such part hereof
as the governing body may determine, and may further provide that the bonds
shall be additionally secured by a pledge of the revenue of the undertaking,
loan program, or other purpose, subject to the rights of the holders of any
bonds then outstanding and the provisions of the ordinances or resolutions
authorizing the outstanding bonds. The county may covenant with the holders of
the bonds additionally secured by a pledge of such revenues that it will
continue to impose and collect such revenues in amounts at least sufficient to
provide for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds to the
extent authorized or permitted by law. Whenever the undertaking, loan program,
or other enterprise shall be under the management and control of a department
or board of the county and the department or board has the power and authority
under chapter 49 to issue revenue bonds under that chapter, no bonds shall be
authorized under this chapter for that undertaking by the governing body of the
county unless the department or board shall have requested the issuance thereof
by resolution and no pledge of the revenue of the undertaking shall be made to
the payment and security of the bonds unless consented to by the department or
board by resolution, and the pledge may be made by the department or board in
the resolution requesting the issuance of the proposed bond issue and
consenting to the pledge. A county may reserve the right to issue subsequent
general obligation bonds equally and additionally secured by a pledge of the
revenues of an undertaking, loan program, or other purpose.

General obligation bonds may also be issued
under this chapter for any purpose authorized by section 47-3 additionally
secured by a pledge of one or more specific categories of receipts not covered
by the preceding paragraph of this section (which may include, without
limitation, any rates, rentals, fees, charges, taxes, state or federal grants
or other receipts) that are not derived from an undertaking or loan program for
which the bonds are issued, as the governing body may determine, subject to the
rights of the holders of any bonds then outstanding and the provisions of the
ordinances or resolutions authorizing the outstanding bonds. The bonds may be
combined into, issued, and sold with other general obligation bonds of the
county as a single issue of bonds. The governing body may require that the
general fund of the county shall be reimbursed from the receipts, for all of
the principal of and interest on the bonds, or for any part hereof as the
governing body may determine. Whenever the receipts to be pledged shall be
under the management and control of a department or board of the county, no
bonds shall be authorized under this chapter additionally secured by a pledge
of the receipts, unless:

(1) The department or board shall have requested the
issuance thereof by resolution; and

(2) The pledge of receipts has been consented to by
the department or board by resolution; provided that the pledge may be made by
the department or board in the same resolution.

The county may covenant with the holders of the
bonds additionally secured by a pledge of such other receipts that it will
continue to impose and collect the receipts in amounts at least sufficient to
provide for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds to the
extent authorized or permitted by law. A county may reserve the right to issue
subsequent general obligation bonds equally and additionally secured by a
pledge of such receipts. [L 1989, c 80, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 231, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next